Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.36.161

Arrangement of instructions, measures, offices—Order of candidates.

(1) On the top of each ballot must be printed:

(a) Clear and concise instructions directing the voter how to mark the ballot, including write-in votes; and

(b) The following statement: "For a list of the people and organizations that donated to state and local candidates and ballot measure campaigns, visit www.pdc.wa.gov." The secretary of state may substitute such language as is necessary for accuracy and clarity and consistent with the intent of this section. Alternately, at the discretion of the county auditor or local election official, the statement required by this subsection (1)(b) may be printed in a prominent position on the ballot envelope and in the materials that accompany the ballot.

(2) The ballot must have a clear delineation between the ballot instructions and the first ballot measure or office through the use of white space, illustration, shading, color, symbol, font size, or bold type. The secretary of state shall establish standards for ballot design and layout consistent with this section and RCW 29A.04.611.

(3) The questions of adopting constitutional amendments or any other state measure authorized by law to be submitted to the voters at that election must appear after the instructions and before any offices.

(4) In a year that president and vice president appear on the general election ballot, the names of candidates for president and vice president for each political party must be grouped together with a single response position for a voter to indicate his or her choice.

The major political party that received the highest number of votes from the electors of this state for the office of president of the United States at the last presidential election must appear first. Other major political parties must follow according to the votes cast for their nominees for president at the last presidential election. Independent candidates and minor parties must follow major parties and be listed in the order of their qualification with the secretary of state.

[ 2013 c 283 s 3; 2013 c 11 s 44; 2011 c 10 s 33; 2010 c 32 s 1; 2004 c 271 s 132.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2013 c 11 s 44 and by 2013 c 283 s 3, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Findings—Intent—2013 c 283: See note following RCW 29A.32.031.

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.